Illinois, session 104th, SB2593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $663,979,600, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 7Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of 8Illinois to meet its operational expenses for the fiscal year 9ending June 30, 2026. 10    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 11thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the 12Education Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of the 13University of Illinois for Labor and Employment Relations:14  For degree programs.................................804,40015  For certificate programs..........................1,500,00016    Total                                          $2,304,400 17    Section 15. The sum of $15,526,900, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 20costs and expenses related to or in support of the Prairie 21Research Institute, in accordance with Public Act 95-0728.   SB2593- 2 -OMB104 00140 LAP 10140 b1    Section 20. The sum of $40,380,600, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 3Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 4operating costs and expenses related to or in support of the 5University of Illinois Hospital. 6    Section 25. The sum of $750,000, or so much thereof as may 7be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 8Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 9costs associated with the Hispanic Center for Excellence at 10the Chicago campus. 11    Section 30. The sum of $283,500, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance 13Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 14Dixon Springs Agricultural Center. 15    Section 35. The sum of $1,079,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the Education 17Assistance Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of 18Illinois for costs associated with the Public Policy Institute 19at the Chicago campus. 20    Section 40. The sum of $302,200, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the Education Assistance   SB2593- 3 -OMB104 00140 LAP 10140 b1Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 2a grant to the College of Dentistry. 3    Section 45. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 6costs associated with the Illinois Heart Rescue. 7    Section 46. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated to the University of 9Illinois from the General Revenue Fund for a grant to the 10University of Illinois at Springfield for the Illinois 11Innocence Project, and any associated administrative expenses. 12    Section 50. The sum of $7,358,700, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Fire Prevention 14Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 15the purpose of maintaining the Illinois Fire Service 16Institute, paying the Institute's expenses, and providing the 17facilities and structures incident thereto, including payment 18to the University for personal services and related costs 19incurred. 20    Section 55. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 21be necessary, is appropriated from the State College and 22University Trust Fund to the Board of Trustees of the   SB2593- 4 -OMB104 00140 LAP 10140 b1University of Illinois for scholarship grant awards. 2    Section 60. The sum of $250,000 or so much thereof as may 3be necessary, is appropriated from the Pet Population Control 4Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 5costs associated with pet population control at the College of 6Veterinary Medicine. 7    Section 65. The sum of $300,000, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the Emergency Public Health 9Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 10costs and expenses related to or in support of Emergency 11Mosquito Abatement. 12    Section 70. The sum of $400,000, or so much thereof as may 13be necessary, is appropriated from the Used Tire Management 14Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of Illinois for 15costs and expenses related to or in support of mosquito 16research and abatement. 17    Section 75. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, is appropriated from the Hazardous Waste 19Research Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of 20Illinois for its ordinary and contingent expenses related to 21the Prairie Research Institute.   SB2593- 5 -OMB104 00140 LAP 10140 b1    Section 80. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the General Professions 3Dedicated Fund to the Board of Trustees of the University of 4Illinois for costs associated with the development, support or 5administration of pharmacy practice education or training 6programs for the College of Medicine at Rockford. 7    Section 85. The sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 9the Board of trustees of the University of Illinois for the 10University's Climate Jobs Institute. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122025.